Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.05, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reporting requirement. new text end new text begin (a) On or before April 30, 2027, and annually thereafter, a public utility or cooperative electric association that is subject to rate regulation under section 216B.026 must report to the commission: new text end new text begin (1) the total authorized revenue for the preceding calendar year; new text end new text begin (2) the total actual revenue collected from customers during the preceding calendar year; and new text end new text begin (3) any other information the commission may require by rule or order. new text end new text begin (b) The revenues reported under paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (2), must be provided separately for base rates and each bill rider. new text end